Missouri, session 2026, HB1847.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 332.081, 332.211, and 332.281, RSMo, are repealed and sixteen
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 332.081, 332.211, 332.281,
332.700, 332.705, 332.710, 332.715, 332.720, 332.725, 332.730, 332.735, 332.740, 332.745,
332.750, 332.755, and 332.760, to read as follows:
332.081. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, hospitals
licensed under chapter 197 shall be authorized to employ any or all of the following oral
health providers:
(1) A dentist licensed under this chapter for the purpose of treating on hospital
premises those patients who present with a dental condition and such treatment is necessary to
ameliorate the condition for which they presented such as severe pain or tooth abscesses;
(2) An oral and maxillofacial surgeon licensed under this chapter for the purpose of
treating oral conditions that need to be ameliorated as part of treating the underlying cause of
the patient's medical needs including, but not limited to, head and neck cancer, HIV or AIDS,
severe trauma resulting in admission to the hospital, organ transplant, diabetes, or seizure
disorders. It shall be a condition of treatment that such patients are admitted to the hospital on
either an in- or out-patient basis; and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1847 2
(3) A maxillofacial prosthodontist licensed under this chapter for the purpose of
treating and supporting patients of a head and neck cancer team or other complex care or
surgical team for the fabrication of appliances following ablative surgery, surgery to correct
birth anomalies, extensive radiation treatment of the head or neck, or trauma-related surgery.
2. No person or other entity shall practice dentistry in Missouri or provide dental
services as [defined] describedin section 332.071 unless and until the board has issued to the
person a certificate certifying that the person has been duly registered as a dentist in Missouri
or the board has issued such certificate to an entity that has been duly registered to provide
dental services by licensed dentists and dental hygienists and unless and until the board has
issued to the person a license, to be renewed each period, as provided in this chapter, to
practice dentistry or as a dental hygienist, or has issued to the person or entity a permit, to be
renewed each period, to provide dental services in Missouri. Nothing in this chapter shall be
so construed as to make it unlawful for:
(1) A legally qualified physician or surgeon, who does not practice dentistry as a
specialty, from extracting teeth;
(2) A dentist licensed in a state other than Missouri from making a clinical
demonstration before a meeting of dentists in Missouri;
(3) Dental students in any accredited dental school to practice dentistry under the
personal direction of instructors;
(4) Dental hygiene students in any accredited dental hygiene school to practice dental
hygiene under the personal direction of instructors;
(5) A duly registered and licensed dental hygienist in Missouri to practice dental
hygiene as defined in section 332.091;
(6) A dental assistant, certified dental assistant, or expanded functions dental assistant
to be delegated duties as defined in section 332.093;
(7) A duly registered dentist or dental hygienist to teach in an accredited dental or
dental hygiene school;
(8) A person who has been granted a dental faculty permit under section 332.183 to
practice dentistry in the scope of his or her employment at an accredited dental school,
college, or program in Missouri;
(9) A duly qualified anesthesiologist or nurse anesthetist to administer an anesthetic
in connection with dental services or dental surgery;
(10) A person to practice dentistry in or for:
(a) The United States Armed Forces;
(b) The United States Public Health Service;
(c) Migrant, community, or health care for the homeless health centers provided in
Section 330 of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Section 254b);

HB 1847 3
(d) Federally qualified health centers as defined in Section 1905(l) (42 U.S.C. Section
1396d(l)) of the Social Security Act;
(e) Governmental entities, including county health departments; or
(f) The United States Veterans Bureau; or
(11) A dentist licensed in a state other than Missouri to evaluate a patient or render an
oral, written, or otherwise documented dental opinion when providing testimony or records
for the purpose of a civil or criminal action before any judicial or administrative proceeding
of this state or other forum in this state.
3. No corporation shall practice dentistry as defined in section 332.071 unless that
corporation is organized under the provisions of chapter 355 or 356 provided that a
corporation organized under the provisions of chapter 355 and qualifying as an organization
under 26 U.S.C. Section 501(c)(3) may only employ dentists and dental hygienists licensed in
this state to render dental services to Medicaid recipients, low-income individuals who have
available income below two hundred percent of the federal poverty level, and all participants
in the SCHIP program, unless such limitation is contrary to or inconsistent with federal or
state law or regulation. This subsection shall not apply to:
(1) A hospital licensed under chapter 197 that provides care and treatment only to
children under the age of eighteen at which a person regulated under this chapter provides
dental care within the scope of his or her license or registration;
(2) A federally qualified health center as defined in Section 1905(l) of the Social
Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1396d(l)), or a migrant, community, or health care for the
homeless health center provided for in Section 330 of the Public Health Services Act (42
U.S.C. Section 254b) at which a person regulated under this chapter provides dental care
within the scope of his or her license or registration;
(3) A city or county health department organized under chapter 192 or chapter 205 at
which a person regulated under this chapter provides dental care within the scope of his or her
license or registration;
(4) A social welfare board organized under section 205.770, a city health department
operating under a city charter, or a city-county health department at which a person regulated
under this chapter provides dental care within the scope of his or her license or registration;
(5) Any entity that has received a permit from the dental board and does not receive
compensation from the patient or from any third party on the patient's behalf at which a
person regulated under this chapter provides dental care within the scope of his or her license
or registration; or
(6) Any hospital nonprofit corporation exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3)
of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, that engages in its operations and provides dental
services at facilities owned by a city, county, or other political subdivision of the state, or any

HB 1847 4
entity contracted with the state to provide care in a correctional center, as such term is
defined in section 217.010, at which a person regulated under this chapter provides dental
care within the scope of his or her license or registration.

If any of the entities exempted from the requirements of this subsection are unable to provide
services to a patient due to the lack of a qualified provider and a referral to another entity is
made, the exemption shall extend to the person or entity that subsequently provides services
to the patient.
4. No unincorporated organization shall practice dentistry as defined in section
332.071 unless such organization is exempt from federal taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and provides dental treatment without
compensation from the patient or any third party on their behalf as a part of a broader
program of social services including food distribution. Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit
100 organizations under this subsection from employing any person regulated by this chapter.
101 5. A dentist shall not enter into a contract that allows a person who is not a dentist to
102 influence or interfere with the exercise of the dentist's independent professional judgment.
103 6. A not-for-profit corporation organized under the provisions of chapter 355 and
104 qualifying as an organization under 26 U.S.C. Section 501(c)(3), an unincorporated
105 organization operating pursuant to subsection 4 of this section, or any other person should not
106 direct or interfere or attempt to direct or interfere with a licensed dentist's professional
107 judgment and competent practice of dentistry. Nothing in this subsection shall be so
108 construed as to make it unlawful for not-for-profit organizations to enforce employment
109 contracts, corporate policy and procedure manuals, or quality improvement or assurance
110 requirements.
111 7. All entities defined in subsection 3 of this section and those exempted under
112 subsection 4 of this section shall apply for a permit to employ dentists and dental hygienists
113 licensed in this state to render dental services, and the entity shall apply for the permit in
114 writing on forms provided by the Missouri dental board. The board shall not charge a fee of
115 any kind for the issuance or renewal of such permit. The provisions of this subsection shall
116 not apply to a federally qualified health center as defined in Section 1905(l) of the Social
117 Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1396d(l)).
118 8. Any entity that obtains a permit to render dental services in this state is subject to
119 discipline pursuant to section 332.321. If the board concludes that the person or entity has
120 committed an act or is engaging in a course of conduct that would be grounds for disciplinary
121 action, the board may file a complaint before the administrative hearing commission. The
122 board may refuse to issue or renew the permit of any entity for one or any combination of
123 causes stated in subsection 2 of section 332.321. The board shall notify the applicant in

HB 1847 5
124 writing of the reasons for the refusal and shall advise the applicant of his or her right to file a
125 complaint with the administrative hearing commission as provided by chapter 621.
126 9. A federally qualified health center as defined in Section 1905(l) of the Social
127 Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1396d(l)) shall register with the board. The information
128 provided to the board as part of the registration shall include the name of the health center, the
129 nonprofit status of the health center, sites where dental services will be provided, and the
130 names of all persons employed by, or contracting with, the health center who are required to
131 hold a license pursuant to this chapter. The registration shall be renewed every twenty-four
132 months. The board shall not charge a fee of any kind for the issuance or renewal of the
133 registration. The registration of the health center shall not be subject to discipline pursuant to
134 section 332.321. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit disciplinary action against a
135 licensee of this chapter who is employed by, or contracts with, such health center for the
136 actions of the licensee in connection with such employment or contract.
137 10. The board may promulgate rules and regulations to ensure not-for-profit
138 corporations are rendering care to the patient populations as set forth herein, including
139 requirements for covered not-for-profit corporations to report patient census data to the board.
140 The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to a federally qualified health center as
141 defined in Section 1905(l) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1396d(l)).
142 11. All not-for-profit corporations organized or operated pursuant to the provisions of
143 chapter 355 and qualifying as an organization under 26 U.S.C. Section 501(c)(3), or the
144 requirements relating to migrant, community, or health care for the homeless health centers
145 provided in Section 330 of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Section 254b) and
146 federally qualified health centers as defined in Section 1905(l) (42 U.S.C. Section 1396d(l))
147 of the Social Security Act, that employ persons who practice dentistry or dental hygiene in
148 this state shall do so in accordance with the relevant laws of this state except to the extent that
149 such laws are contrary to, or inconsistent with, federal statute or regulation.
332.211. [The board shall grant without examination a certificate of registration and a
license to a dentist who has been licensed in another state for at least five consecutive years
immediately preceding his applying, if the board is satisfied by proof adduced by the
applicant that his qualifications are at least equivalent to the requirements for initial
registration as a dentist in Missouri under the provisions of this chapter, that he is at least
twenty-one years of age and is of good moral character and reputation; provided that the
board may by rule require an applicant under this section to take any examination over
Missouri laws given to dentists initially seeking licensure under section 332.151 and to take a
practical examination if his licensure in any state was ever denied, revoked or suspended for
incompetency or inability to practice in a safe manner, or if he has failed any practical
examination given as a prerequisite to licensure as a dentist in any state. Any such dentist

HB 1847 6
applying to be so registered and licensed shall accompany his application with a fee not
greater than the dental examination and license fees and if registered and licensed shall renew
his license as provided in section 332.181.] 1. For purposes of this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "License", a license, certificate, registration, permit, accreditation, or
military occupational specialty that enables a person to legally practice an occupation or
profession in a particular jurisdiction;
(2) "Military", the Armed Forces of the United States, including the Air Force,
Army, Coast Guard, Marine Corps, Navy, Space Force, National Guard, and any other
military branch that is designated by Congress as part of the Armed Forces of the
United States, and all reserve components and auxiliaries. The term "military" also
includes the military reserves and militia of any United States territory or state;
(3) "Nonresident military spouse", a nonresident spouse of an active-duty
member of the Armed Forces of the United States who has been transferred or is
scheduled to be transferred to the state of Missouri, or who has been transferred or is
scheduled to be transferred to an adjacent state and is or will be domiciled in the state of
Missouri, or has moved to the state of Missouri on a permanent change-of-station basis;
(4) "Oversight body", any board, department, agency, or office of a jurisdiction
that issues licenses;
(5) "Resident military spouse", a spouse of an active-duty member of the Armed
Forces of the United States who has been transferred or is scheduled to be transferred to
the state of Missouri or an adjacent state and who is a permanent resident of the state of
Missouri, who is domiciled in the state of Missouri, or who has Missouri as his or her
home of record.
2. Any person who holds a valid current dentist license issued by another state, a
branch or unit of the military, a territory of the United States, or the District of
Columbia, and who has been licensed for at least one year in such other jurisdiction,
may submit to the board an application for a dentist license in Missouri along with proof
of current licensure and proof of licensure for at least one year in the other jurisdiction.
3. The board shall:
(1) Within six months of receiving an application described in subsection 2 of
this section, waive any examination, educational, or experience requirements for
licensure in this state for the applicant if it determines that there were minimum
education requirements and, if applicable, work experience and clinical supervision
requirements in effect and the other jurisdiction verifies that the person met those
requirements in order to be licensed or certified in that jurisdiction. The board may
require an applicant to take and pass an examination specific to the laws of this state; or

HB 1847 7
(2) Within thirty days of receiving an application described in subsection 2 of
this section from a nonresident military spouse or a resident military spouse, waive any
examination, educational, or experience requirements for licensure in this state for the
applicant and issue such applicant a license under this section if such applicant
otherwise meets the requirements of this section.
4. (1) The board shall not waive any examination, educational, or experience
requirements for any applicant who has had his or her license revoked by an oversight
body outside the state; who is currently under investigation, who has a complaint
pending, or who is currently under disciplinary action, except as provided in subdivision
(2) of this subsection, with an oversight body outside the state; who does not hold a
license in good standing with an oversight body outside the state; who has a criminal
record that would disqualify him or her for licensure in Missouri; or who does not hold
a valid current license in the other jurisdiction on the date the board receives his or her
application under this section.
(2) If another jurisdiction has taken disciplinary action against an applicant, the
board shall determine if the cause for the action was corrected and the matter resolved.
If the matter has not been resolved by that jurisdiction, the board may deny a license
until the matter is resolved.
5. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the board from denying a license to an
applicant under this section for any reason described in section 332.321.
6. Any person who is licensed under the provisions of this section shall be subject
to the board's jurisdiction and all rules and regulations pertaining to the practice as a
dentist in this state.
7. This section shall not be construed to waive any requirement for an applicant
to pay any fees.
332.281. [The board shall grant without examination a certificate of registration and
license to a dental hygienist who has been licensed in another state for at least two
consecutive years immediately preceding his application to practice in Missouri if the board is
satisfied by proof adduced by the applicant that his qualifications are at least equivalent to the
requirements for initial registration as a dental hygienist in Missouri under the provisions of
this chapter; provided that the board may by rule require an applicant under this section to
take any examination over Missouri laws given to dental hygienist initially seeking licensure
under section 332.251 and to take a practical examination if his licensure in any state was
ever denied, revoked or suspended for incompetency or inability to practice in a safe manner,
or if he has failed any practical examination given as a prerequisite to licensure as a dental
hygienist in any state. Any such dental hygienist applying to be so registered and licensed
shall accompany his application with a fee not greater than the dental hygienist examination

HB 1847 8
and license fees and if registered and licensed shall renew his license as provided in section
332.261.] 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "License", a license, certificate, registration, permit, accreditation, or
military occupational specialty that enables a person to legally practice an occupation or
profession in a particular jurisdiction;
(2) "Military", the Armed Forces of the United States, including the Air Force,
Army, Coast Guard, Marine Corps, Navy, Space Force, National Guard, and any other
military branch that is designated by Congress as part of the Armed Forces of the
United States, and all reserve components and auxiliaries. The term "military" also
includes the military reserves and militia of any United States territory or state;
(3) "Nonresident military spouse", a nonresident spouse of an active-duty
member of the Armed Forces of the United States who has been transferred or is
scheduled to be transferred to the state of Missouri, or who has been transferred or is
scheduled to be transferred to an adjacent state and is or will be domiciled in the state of
Missouri, or has moved to the state of Missouri on a permanent change-of-station basis;
(4) "Oversight body", any board, department, agency, or office of a jurisdiction
that issues licenses;
(5) "Resident military spouse", a spouse of an active-duty member of the Armed
Forces of the United States who has been transferred or is scheduled to be transferred to
the state of Missouri or an adjacent state and who is a permanent resident of the state of
Missouri, who is domiciled in the state of Missouri, or who has Missouri as his or her
home of record.
2. Any person who holds a valid current dental hygienist license issued by
another state, a branch or unit of the military, a territory of the United States, or the
District of Columbia, and who has been licensed for at least one year in such other
jurisdiction, may submit to the board an application for a dental hygienist license in
Missouri along with proof of current licensure and proof of licensure for at least one
year in the other jurisdiction.
3. The board shall:
(1) Within six months of receiving an application described in subsection 2 of
this section, waive any examination, educational, or experience requirements for
licensure in this state for the applicant if it determines that there were minimum
education requirements and, if applicable, work experience and clinical supervision
requirements in effect and the other jurisdiction verifies that the person met those
requirements in order to be licensed or certified in that jurisdiction. The board may
require an applicant to take and pass an examination specific to the laws of this state; or

HB 1847 9
(2) Within thirty days of receiving an application described in subsection 2 of
this section from a nonresident military spouse or a resident military spouse, waive any
examination, educational, or experience requirements for licensure in this state for the
applicant and issue such applicant a license under this section if such applicant
otherwise meets the requirements of this section.
4. (1) The board shall not waive any examination, educational, or experience
requirements for any applicant who has had his or her license revoked by an oversight
body outside the state; who is currently under investigation, who has a complaint
pending, or who is currently under disciplinary action, except as provided in subdivision
(2) of this subsection, with an oversight body outside the state; who does not hold a
license in good standing with an oversight body outside the state; who has a criminal
record that would disqualify him or her for licensure in Missouri; or who does not hold
a valid current license in the other jurisdiction on the date the board receives his or her
application under this section.
(2) If another jurisdiction has taken disciplinary action against an applicant, the
board shall determine if the cause for the action was corrected and the matter resolved.
If the matter has not been resolved by that jurisdiction, the board may deny a license
until the matter is resolved.
5. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the board from denying a license to an
applicant under this section for any reason described in section 332.321.
6. Any person who is licensed under the provisions of this section shall be subject
to the board's jurisdiction and all rules and regulations pertaining to the practice as a
dental hygienist in this state.
7. This section shall not be construed to waive any requirement for an applicant
to pay any fees.
332.700. Sections 332.700 to 332.760 shall be known and cited as the Dentist and
Dental Hygienist Compact. The purposes of this Compact are to facilitate the interstate
practice of dentistry and dental hygiene and improve public access to dentistry and
dental hygiene services by providing Dentists and Dental Hygienists licensed in a
Participating State the ability to practice in Participating States in which they are not
licensed. The Compact does this by establishing a pathway for Dentists and Dental
Hygienists licensed in a Participating State to obtain a Compact Privilege that
authorizes them to practice in another Participating State in which they are not licensed.
The Compact enables Participating States to protect the public health and safety with
respect to the practice of such Dentists and Dental Hygienists, through the State's
authority to regulate the practice of dentistry and dental hygiene in the State. The
Compact:

HB 1847 10
(1) Enables Dentists and Dental Hygienists who qualify for a Compact Privilege
to practice in other Participating States without satisfying burdensome and duplicative
requirements associated with securing a License to practice in those States;
(2) Promotes mobility and addresses workforce shortages through each
Participating State's acceptance of a Compact Privilege to practice in that State;
(3) Increases public access to qualified, licensed Dentists and Dental Hygienists
by creating a responsible, streamlined pathway for Licensees to practice in Participating
States;
(4) Enhances the ability of Participating States to protect the public's health and
safety;
(5) Does not interfere with licensure requirements established by a Participating
State;
(6) Facilitates the sharing of licensure and disciplinary information among
Participating States;
(7) Requires Dentists and Dental Hygienists who practice in a Participating State
pursuant to a Compact Privilege to practice within the Scope of Practice authorized in
that State;
(8) Extends the authority of a Participating State to regulate the practice of
dentistry and dental hygiene within its borders to Dentists and Dental Hygienists who
practice in the State through a Compact Privilege;
(9) Promotes the cooperation of Participating States in regulating the practice of
dentistry and dental hygiene within those States;
(10) Facilitates the relocation of military members and their spouses who are
licensed to practice dentistry or dental hygiene.
332.705. As used in this Compact, unless the context requires otherwise, the
following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Active Military Member" means any person with full-time duty status in
the armed forces of the United States, including members of the National Guard and
Reserve.
(2) "Adverse Action" means disciplinary action or encumbrance imposed on a
License or Compact Privilege by a State Licensing Authority.
(3) "Alternative Program" means a non-disciplinary monitoring or practice
remediation process applicable to a Dentist or Dental Hygienist approved by a State
Licensing Authority of a Participating State in which the Dentist or Dental Hygienist is
licensed. This includes, but is not limited to, programs to which Licensees with
substance abuse or addiction issues are referred in lieu of Adverse Action.

HB 1847 11
(4) "Clinical Assessment" means examination or process, required for licensure
as a Dentist or Dental Hygienist as applicable, that provides evidence of clinical
competence in dentistry or dental hygiene.
(5) "Commissioner" means the individual appointed by a Participating State to
serve as the member of the Commission for that Participating State.
(6) "Compact" means this Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact.
(7) "Compact Privilege" means the authorization granted by a Remote State to
allow a Licensee from a Participating State to practice as a Dentist or Dental Hygienist
in a Remote State.
(8) "Continuing Professional Development" means a requirement, as a condition
of License renewal to provide evidence of successful participation in educational or
professional activities relevant to practice or area of work.
(9) "Criminal Background Check" means the submission of fingerprints or
other biometric-based information for a License applicant for the purpose of obtaining
that applicant's criminal history record information, as defined in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(d)
from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the State's criminal history record
repository as defined in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(f).
(10) "Data System" means the Commission's repository of information about
Licensees, including but not limited to examination, licensure, investigative, Compact
Privilege, Adverse Action, and Alternative Program.
(11) "Dental Hygienist" means an individual who is licensed by a State Licensing
Authority to practice dental hygiene.
(12) "Dentist" means an individual who is licensed by a State Licensing
Authority to practice dentistry.
(13) "Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact Commission" or "Commission"
means a joint government agency established by this Compact comprised of each State
that has enacted the Compact and a national administrative body comprised of a
Commissioner from each State that has enacted the Compact.
(14) "Encumbered License" means a License that a State Licensing Authority
has limited in any way other than through an Alternative Program.
(15) "Executive Board" means the Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary and Treasurer
and any other Commissioners as may be determined by Commission Rule or bylaw.
(16) "Jurisprudence Requirement" means the assessment of an individual's
knowledge of the laws and Rules governing the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene,
as applicable, in a State.

HB 1847 12
(17) "License" means current authorization by a State, other than authorization
pursuant to a Compact Privilege, or other privilege, for an individual to practice as a
Dentist or Dental Hygienist in that State.
(18) "Licensee" means an individual who holds an unrestricted License from a
Participating State to practice as a Dentist or Dental Hygienist in that State.
(19) "Model Compact" means the model for the Dentist and Dental Hygienist
Compact on file with the Council of State Governments or other entity as designated by
the Commission.
(20) "Participating State" means a State that has enacted the Compact and been
admitted to the Commission in accordance with the provisions herein and Commission
Rules.
(21) "Qualifying License" means a License that is not an Encumbered License
issued by a Participating State to practice dentistry or dental hygiene.
(22) "Remote State" means a Participating State where a Licensee who is not
licensed as a Dentist or Dental Hygienist is exercising or seeking to exercise the Compact
Privilege.
(23) "Rule" means a regulation promulgated by an entity that has the force of
law.
(24) "Scope of Practice" means the procedures, actions, and processes a Dentist
or Dental Hygienist licensed in a State is permitted to undertake in that State and the
circumstances under which the Licensee is permitted to undertake those procedures,
actions and processes. Such procedures, actions and processes and the circumstances
under which they may be undertaken may be established through means, including, but
not limited to, statute, regulations, case law, and other processes available to the State
Licensing Authority or other government agency.
(25) "Significant Investigative Information" means information, records, and
documents received or generated by a State Licensing Authority pursuant to an
investigation for which a determination has been made that there is probable cause to
believe that the Licensee has violated a statute or regulation that is considered more
than a minor infraction for which the State Licensing Authority could pursue Adverse
Action against the Licensee.
(26) "State" means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United
States of America that regulates the practices of dentistry and dental hygiene.
(27) "State Licensing Authority" means an agency or other entity of a State that
is responsible for the licensing and regulation of Dentists or Dental Hygienists.
332.710. 1. In order to join the Compact and thereafter continue as a
Participating State, a State must:

HB 1847 13
(1) Enact a compact that is not materially different from the Model Compact as
determined in accordance with Commission Rules;
(2) Participate fully in the Commission's Data System;
(3) Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints about
its Licensees and License applicants;
(4) Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of the Compact and
Commission Rules, of any Adverse Action or the availability of Significant Investigative
Information regarding a Licensee and License applicant;
(5) Fully implement a Criminal Background Check requirement, within a time
frame established by Commission Rule, by receiving the results of a qualifying Criminal
Background Check;
(6) Comply with the Commission Rules applicable to a Participating State;
(7) Accept the National Board Examinations of the Joint Commission on
National Dental Examinations or another examination accepted by Commission Rule as
a licensure examination;
(8) Accept for licensure that applicants for a Dentist License graduate from a
predoctoral dental education program accredited by the Commission on Dental
Accreditation, or another accrediting agency recognized by the United States
Department of Education for the accreditation of dentistry and dental hygiene
education programs, leading to the Doctor of Dental Surgery (D.D.S.) or Doctor of
Dental Medicine (D.M.D.) degree;
(9) Accept for licensure that applicants for a Dental Hygienist License graduate
from a dental hygiene education program accredited by the Commission on Dental
Accreditation or another accrediting agency recognized by the United States
Department of Education for the accreditation of dentistry and dental hygiene
education programs;
(10) Require for licensure that applicants successfully complete a Clinical
Assessment;
(11) Have Continuing Professional Development requirements as a condition for
License renewal; and
(12) Pay a participation fee to the Commission as established by Commission
Rule.
2. Providing alternative pathways for an individual to obtain an unrestricted
License does not disqualify a State from participating in the Compact.
3. When conducting a Criminal Background Check the State Licensing
Authority shall:
(1) Consider that information in making a licensure decision;

HB 1847 14
(2) Maintain documentation of completion of the Criminal Background Check
and background check information to the extent allowed by State and federal law; and
(3) Report to the Commission whether it has completed the Criminal
Background Check and whether the individual was granted or denied a License.
4. A Licensee of a Participating State who has a Qualifying License in that State
and does not hold an Encumbered License in any other Participating State, shall be
issued a Compact Privilege in a Remote State in accordance with the terms of the
Compact and Commission Rules. If a Remote State has a Jurisprudence Requirement a
Compact Privilege will not be issued to the Licensee unless the Licensee has satisfied the
Jurisprudence Requirement.
332.715. 1. To obtain and exercise the Compact Privilege under the terms and
provisions of the Compact, the Licensee shall:
(1) Have a Qualifying License as a Dentist or Dental Hygienist in a Participating
State;
(2) Be eligible for a Compact Privilege in any Remote State in accordance with
subsections 4, 7, and 8 of this section;
(3) Submit to an application process whenever the Licensee is seeking a Compact
Privilege;
(4) Pay any applicable Commission and Remote State fees for a Compact
Privilege in the Remote State;
(5) Meet any Jurisprudence Requirement established by a Remote State in
which the Licensee is seeking a Compact Privilege;
(6) Have passed a National Board Examination of the Joint Commission on
National Dental Examinations or another examination accepted by Commission Rule;
(7) For a Dentist, have graduated from a predoctoral dental education program
accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation, or another accrediting agency
recognized by the United States Department of Education for the accreditation of
dentistry and dental hygiene education programs, leading to the Doctor of Dental
Surgery (D.D.S.) or Doctor of Dental Medicine (D.M.D.) degree;
(8) For a Dental Hygienist, have graduated from a dental hygiene education
program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation or another accrediting
agency recognized by the United States Department of Education for the accreditation
of dentistry and dental hygiene education programs;
(9) Have successfully completed a Clinical Assessment for licensure;
(10) Report to the Commission Adverse Action taken by any non-Participating
State when applying for a Compact Privilege and, otherwise, within thirty (30) days
from the date the Adverse Action is taken;

HB 1847 15
(11) Report to the Commission when applying for a Compact Privilege the
address of the Licensee's primary residence and thereafter immediately report to the
Commission any change in the address of the Licensee's primary residence; and
(12) Consent to accept service of process by mail at the Licensee's primary
residence on record with the Commission with respect to any action brought against the
Licensee by the Commission or a Participating State, and consent to accept service of a
subpoena by mail at the Licensee's primary residence on record with the Commission
with respect to any action brought or investigation conducted by the Commission or a
Participating State.
2. The Licensee must comply with the requirements of subsection 1 of this
section to maintain the Compact Privilege in the Remote State. If those requirements
are met, the Compact Privilege will continue as long as the Licensee maintains a
Qualifying License in the State through which the Licensee applied for the Compact
Privilege and pays any applicable Compact Privilege renewal fees.
3. A Licensee providing dentistry or dental hygiene in a Remote State under the
Compact Privilege shall function within the Scope of Practice authorized by the Remote
State for a Dentist or Dental Hygienist licensed in that State.
4. A Licensee providing dentistry or dental hygiene pursuant to a Compact
Privilege in a Remote State is subject to that State's regulatory authority. A Remote
State may, in accordance with due process and that State's laws, by Adverse Action
revoke or remove a Licensee's Compact Privilege in the Remote State for a specific
period of time and impose fines or take any other necessary actions to protect the health
and safety of its citizens. If a Remote State imposes an Adverse Action against a
Compact Privilege that limits the Compact Privilege, that Adverse Action applies to all
Compact Privileges in all Remote States. A Licensee whose Compact Privilege in a
Remote State is removed for a specified period of time is not eligible for a Compact
Privilege in any other Remote State until the specific time for removal of the Compact
Privilege has passed and all encumbrance requirements are satisfied.
5. If a License in a Participating State is an Encumbered License, the Licensee
shall lose the Compact Privilege in a Remote State and shall not be eligible for a
Compact Privilege in any Remote State until the License is no longer encumbered.
6. Once an Encumbered License in a Participating State is restored to good
standing, the Licensee must meet the requirements of subsection 1 of this section to
obtain a Compact Privilege in a Remote State.
7. If a Licensee's Compact Privilege in a Remote State is removed by the Remote
State, the individual shall lose or be ineligible for the Compact Privilege in any Remote
State until the following occur:

HB 1847 16
(1) The specific period of time for which the Compact Privilege was removed has
ended; and
(2) All conditions for removal of the Compact Privilege have been satisfied.
8. Once the requirements of subsection 7 of this section have been met, the
Licensee must meet the requirements in subsection 1 of this section to obtain a Compact
Privilege in a Remote State.
332.720. An Active Military Member and their spouse shall not be required to
pay to the Commission for a Compact Privilege the fee otherwise charged by the
Commission. If a Remote State chooses to charge a fee for a Compact Privilege, it may
choose to charge a reduced fee or no fee to an Active Military Member and their spouse
for a Compact Privilege.
332.725. 1. A Participating State in which a Licensee is licensed shall have
exclusive authority to impose Adverse Action against the Qualifying License issued by
that Participating State.
2. A Participating State may take Adverse Action based on the Significant
Investigative Information of a Remote State, so long as the Participating State follows its
own procedures for imposing Adverse Action.
3. Nothing in this Compact shall override a Participating State's decision that
participation in an Alternative Program may be used in lieu of Adverse Action and that
such participation shall remain non-public if required by the Participating State's laws.
Participating States must require Licensees who enter any Alternative Program in lieu
of discipline to agree not to practice pursuant to a Compact Privilege in any other
Participating State during the term of the Alternative Program without prior
authorization from such other Participating State.
4. Any Participating State in which a Licensee is applying to practice or is
practicing pursuant to a Compact Privilege may investigate actual or alleged violations
of the statutes and regulations authorizing the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene in
any other Participating State in which the Dentist or Dental Hygienist holds a License or
Compact Privilege.
5. A Remote State shall have the authority to:
(1) Take Adverse Actions as set forth in subsection 4 of section 332.715 against a
Licensee's Compact Privilege in the State;
(2) In furtherance of its rights and responsibilities under the Compact and the
Commission's Rules issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require
the attendance and testimony of witnesses, and the production of evidence. Subpoenas
issued by a State Licensing Authority in a Participating State for the attendance and
testimony of witnesses, or the production of evidence from another Participating State,

HB 1847 17
shall be enforced in the latter State by any court of competent jurisdiction, according to
the practice and procedure of that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings
pending before it. The issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses,
mileage, and other fees required by the service statutes of the State where the witnesses
or evidence are located; and
(3) If otherwise permitted by State law, recover from the Licensee the costs of
investigations and disposition of cases resulting from any Adverse Action taken against
that Licensee.
6. (1) In addition to the authority granted to a Participating State by its Dentist
or Dental Hygienist licensure act or other applicable State law, a Participating State
may jointly investigate Licensees with other Participating States.
(2) Participating States shall share any Significant Investigative Information,
litigation, or compliance materials in furtherance of any joint or individual investigation
initiated under the Compact.
7. (1) After a Licensee's Compact Privilege in a Remote State is terminated, the
Remote State may continue an investigation of the Licensee that began when the
Licensee had a Compact Privilege in that Remote State.
(2) If the investigation yields what would be Significant Investigative
Information had the Licensee continued to have a Compact Privilege in that Remote
State, the Remote State shall report the presence of such information to the Data System
as required by subdivision (6) of subsection 2 of section 332.735 as if it was Significant
Investigative Information.
332.730. 1. The Compact Participating States hereby create and establish a joint
government agency whose membership consists of all Participating States that have
enacted the Compact. The Commission is an instrumentality of the Participating States
acting jointly and not an instrumentality of any one State. The Commission shall come
into existence on or after the effective date of the Compact as set forth in subsection 1 of
section 332.750.
2. (1) Each Participating State shall have and be limited to one (1)
Commissioner selected by that Participating State's State Licensing Authority or, if
the State has more than one State Licensing Authority, selected collectively by the State
Licensing Authorities.
(2) The Commissioner shall be a member or designee of such Authority or
Authorities.
(3) The Commission may by Rule or bylaw establish a term of office for
Commissioners and may by Rule or bylaw establish term limits.

HB 1847 18
(4) The Commission may recommend to a State Licensing Authority or
Authorities, as applicable, removal or suspension of an individual as the State's
Commissioner.
(5) A Participating State's State Licensing Authority, or Authorities, as
applicable, shall fill any vacancy of its Commissioner on the Commission within sixty
(60) days of the vacancy.
(6) Each Commissioner shall be entitled to one vote on all matters that are voted
upon by the Commission.
(7) The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year.
Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws. The Commission may meet
by telecommunication, video conference or other similar electronic means.
3. The Commission shall have the following powers:
(1) Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
(2) Establish a code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;
(3) Adopt Rules and bylaws;
(4) Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
(5) Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this
Compact, the Commission's Rules, and the bylaws;
(6) Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of the
Commission, provided that the standing of any State Licensing Authority to sue or be
sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
(7) Maintain and certify records and information provided to a Participating
State as the authenticated business records of the Commission, and designate a person
to do so on the Commission's behalf;
(8) Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
(9) Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including, but not
limited to, employees of a Participating State;
(10) Conduct an annual financial review;
(11) Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties,
grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the Compact,
and establish the Commission's personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of
interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel matters;
(12) As set forth in the Commission Rules, charge a fee to a Licensee for the
grant of a Compact Privilege in a Remote State and thereafter, as may be established by
Commission Rule, charge the Licensee a Compact Privilege renewal fee for each
renewal period in which that Licensee exercises or intends to exercise the Compact
Privilege in that Remote State. Nothing herein shall be construed to prevent a Remote

HB 1847 19
State from charging a Licensee a fee for a Compact Privilege or renewals of a Compact
Privilege, or a fee for the Jurisprudence Requirement if the Remote State imposes such
a requirement for the grant of a Compact Privilege;
(13) Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of money, other
sources of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and receive, utilize, and
dispose of the same; provided that at all times the Commission shall avoid any
appearance of impropriety and/or conflict of interest;
(14) Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any property, real,
personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
(15) Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise
dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed;
(16) Establish a budget and make expenditures;
(17) Borrow money;
(18) Appoint committees, including standing committees, which may be
composed of members, State regulators, State legislators or their representatives, and
consumer representatives, and such other interested persons as may be designated in
this Compact and the bylaws;
(19) Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law enforcement
agencies;
(20) Elect a Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary and Treasurer and such other officers
of the Commission as provided in the Commission's bylaws;
(21) Establish and elect an Executive Board;
(22) Adopt and provide to the Participating States an annual report;
(23) Determine whether a State's enacted compact is materially different from
the Model Compact language such that the State would not qualify for participation in
the Compact; and
(24) Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve
the purposes of this Compact.
4. (1) All meetings of the Commission that are not closed pursuant to this
subsection shall be open to the public. Notice of public meetings shall be posted on the
Commission's website at least thirty (30) days prior to the public meeting.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, the Commission may
convene an emergency public meeting by providing at least twenty-four (24) hours prior
notice on the Commission's website, and any other means as provided in the
Commission's Rules, for any of the reasons it may dispense with notice of proposed
rulemaking under subsection 12 of section 332.740. The Commission's legal counsel

HB 1847 20
shall certify that one of the reasons justifying an emergency public meeting has been
met.
(3) Notice of all Commission meetings shall provide the time, date, and location
of the meeting, and if the meeting is to be held or accessible via telecommunication,
video conference, or other electronic means, the notice shall include the mechanism for
access to the meeting through such means.
(4) The Commission may convene in a closed, non-public meeting for the
Commission to receive legal advice or to discuss:
(a) Non-compliance of a Participating State with its obligations under the
Compact;
(b) The employment, compensation, discipline or other matters, practices or
procedures related to specific employees or other matters related to the Commission's
100 internal personnel practices and procedures;
101 (c) Current or threatened discipline of a Licensee or Compact Privilege holder
102 by the Commission or by a Participating State's Licensing Authority;
103 (d) Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
104 (e) Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods, services, or
105 real estate;
106 (f) Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
107 (g) Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or
108 confidential;
109 (h) Information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly
110 unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
111 (i) Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
112 (j) Information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of
113 or for use of the Commission or other committee charged with responsibility of
114 investigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant to the Compact;
115 (k) Legal advice;
116 (l) Matters specifically exempted from disclosure to the public by federal or
117 Participating State law; and
118 (m) Other matters as promulgated by the Commission by Rule.
119 (5) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding officer shall state
120 that the meeting will be closed and reference each relevant exempting provision, and
121 such reference shall be recorded in the minutes.
122 (6) The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe all
123 matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions
124 taken, and the reasons therefor, including a description of the views expressed. All

HB 1847 21
125 documents considered in connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes.
126 All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to
127 release only by a majority vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent
128 jurisdiction.
129 5. (1) The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable
130 expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.
131 (2) The Commission may accept any and all appropriate sources of revenue,
132 donations, and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services.
133 (3) The Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each
134 Participating State and impose fees on Licensees of Participating States when a
135 Compact Privilege is granted, to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the
136 Commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount sufficient to cover its annual
137 budget as approved each fiscal year for which sufficient revenue is not provided by
138 other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount for Participating States shall
139 be allocated based upon a formula that the Commission shall promulgate by Rule.
140 (4) The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the
141 funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Commission pledge the credit of any
142 Participating State, except by and with the authority of the Participating State.
143 (5) The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and
144 disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be subject
145 to the financial review and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. All
146 receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the Commission shall be subject to an
147 annual financial review by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the report of
148 the financial review shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the
149 Commission.
150 6. (1) The Executive Board shall have the power to act on behalf of the
151 Commission according to the terms of this Compact. The powers, duties, and
152 responsibilities of the Executive Board shall include:
153 (a) Overseeing the day-to-day activities of the administration of the Compact
154 including compliance with the provisions of the Compact, the Commission's Rules and
155 bylaws;
156 (b) Recommending to the Commission changes to the Rules or bylaws, changes
157 to this Compact legislation, fees charged to Compact Participating States, fees charged
158 to Licensees, and other fees;
159 (c) Ensuring Compact administration services are appropriately provided,
160 including by contract;
161 (d) Preparing and recommending the budget;

HB 1847 22
162 (e) Maintaining financial records on behalf of the Commission;
163 (f) Monitoring Compact compliance of Participating States and providing
164 compliance reports to the Commission;
165 (g) Establishing additional committees as necessary;
166 (h) Exercising the powers and duties of the Commission during the interim
167 between Commission meetings, except for adopting or amending Rules, adopting or
168 amending bylaws, and exercising any other powers and duties expressly reserved to the
169 Commission by Rule or bylaw; and
170 (i) Other duties as provided in the Rules or bylaws of the Commission.
171 (2) The Executive Board shall be composed of up to seven (7) members:
172 (a) The Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary and Treasurer of the Commission and any
173 other members of the Commission who serve on the Executive Board shall be voting
174 members of the Executive Board; and
175 (b) Other than the Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary, and Treasurer, the Commission
176 may elect up to three (3) voting members from the current membership of the
177 Commission.
178 (3) The Commission may remove any member of the Executive Board as
179 provided in the Commission's bylaws.
180 (4) The Executive Board shall meet at least annually.
181 (a) An Executive Board meeting at which it takes or intends to take formal
182 action on a matter shall be open to the public, except that the Executive Board may meet
183 in a closed, non-public session of a public meeting when dealing with any of the matters
184 covered under subdivision (4) of subsection 4 of this section.
185 (b) The Executive Board shall give five (5) business days' notice of its public
186 meetings, posted on its website and as it may otherwise determine to provide notice to
187 persons with an interest in the public matters the Executive Board intends to address at
188 those meetings.
189 (5) The Executive Board may hold an emergency meeting when acting for the
190 Commission to:
191 (a) Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
192 (b) Prevent a loss of Commission or Participating State funds; or
193 (c) Protect public health and safety.
194 7. (1) The members, officers, executive director, employees and representatives
195 of the Commission shall be immune from suit and liability, both personally and in their
196 official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or
197 other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or
198 omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a

HB 1847 23
199 reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment,
200 duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to
201 protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability
202 caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The
203 procurement of insurance of any type by the Commission shall not in any way
204 compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
205 (2) The Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director,
206 employee, and representative of the Commission in any civil action seeking to impose
207 liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within
208 the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as determined by
209 the Commission that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis
210 for believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or
211 responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that
212 person from retaining their own counsel at their own expense; and provided further,
213 that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person's
214 intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
215 (3) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, should any member,
216 officer, executive director, employee, or representative of the Commission be held liable
217 for the amount of any settlement or judgment arising out of any actual or alleged act,
218 error, or omission that occurred within the scope of that individual's employment,
219 duties, or responsibilities for the Commission, or that the person to whom that
220 individual is liable had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of the
221 individual's employment, duties, or responsibilities for the Commission, the
222 Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless such individual, provided that the
223 actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from the intentional or willful or
224 wanton misconduct of the individual.
225 (4) Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of any
226 Licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be governed solely by
227 any other applicable State laws.
228 (5) Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise abrogate
229 a Participating State's state action immunity or state action affirmative defense with
230 respect to antitrust claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other State or
231 federal antitrust or anticompetitive law or regulation.
232 (6) Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign
233 immunity by the Participating States or by the Commission.
332.735. 1. The Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance,
operation, and utilization of a coordinated database and reporting system containing

HB 1847 24
licensure, Adverse Action, and the presence of Significant Investigative Information on
all Licensees and applicants for a License in Participating States.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the contrary, a
Participating State shall submit a uniform data set to the Data System on all individuals
to whom this Compact is applicable as required by the Rules of the Commission,
including:
(1) Identifying information;
(2) Licensure data;
(3) Adverse Actions against a Licensee, License applicant or Compact Privilege
and information related thereto;
(4) Non-confidential information related to Alternative Program participation,
the beginning and ending dates of such participation, and other information related to
such participation;
(5) Any denial of an application for licensure, and the reason or reasons for such
denial, (excluding the reporting of any criminal history record information where
prohibited by law);
(6) The presence of Significant Investigative Information; and
(7) Other information that may facilitate the administration of this Compact or
the protection of the public, as determined by the Rules of the Commission.
3. The records and information provided to a Participating State pursuant to
this Compact or through the Data System, when certified by the Commission or an
agent thereof, shall constitute the authenticated business records of the Commission,
and shall be entitled to any associated hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-
judicial or administrative proceedings in a Participating State.
4. Significant Investigative Information pertaining to a Licensee in any
Participating State will only be available to other Participating States.
5. It is the responsibility of the Participating States to monitor the database to
determine whether Adverse Action has been taken against a Licensee or License
applicant. Adverse Action information pertaining to a Licensee or License applicant in
any Participating State will be available to any other Participating State.
6. Participating States contributing information to the Data System may
designate information that may not be shared with the public without the express
permission of the contributing State.
7. Any information submitted to the Data System that is subsequently expunged
pursuant to federal law or the laws of the Participating State contributing the
information shall be removed from the Data System.

HB 1847 25
332.740. 1. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules in order to
effectively and efficiently implement and administer the purposes and provisions of the
Compact. A Commission Rule shall be invalid and have no force or effect only if a court
of competent jurisdiction holds that the Rule is invalid because the Commission
exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the scope and purposes of
the Compact, or the powers granted hereunder, or based upon another applicable
standard of review.
2. The Rules of the Commission shall have the force of law in each Participating
State, provided however that where the Rules of the Commission conflict with the laws
of the Participating State that establish the Participating State's Scope of Practice as
held by a court of competent jurisdiction, the Rules of the Commission shall be
ineffective in that State to the extent of the conflict.
3. The Commission shall exercise its Rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria
set forth in this section and the Rules adopted thereunder. Rules shall become binding
as of the date specified by the Commission for each Rule.
4. If a majority of the legislatures of the Participating States rejects a
Commission Rule or portion of a Commission Rule, by enactment of a statute or
resolution in the same manner used to adopt the Compact, within four (4) years of the
date of adoption of the Rule, then such Rule shall have no further force and effect in any
Participating State or to any State applying to participate in the Compact.
5. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the Commission.
6. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Commission shall hold a public
hearing and allow persons to provide oral and written comments, data, facts, opinions,
and arguments.
7. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule by the Commission, and at least thirty
(30) days in advance of the meeting at which the Commission will hold a public hearing
on the proposed Rule, the Commission shall provide a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking:
(1) On the website of the Commission or other publicly accessible platform;
(2) To persons who have requested notice of the Commission's notices of
proposed rulemaking; and
(3) In such other way or ways as the Commission may by Rule specify.
8. The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking shall include:
(1) The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the Commission
will hear public comments on the proposed Rule and, if different, the time, date, and
location of the meeting where the Commission will consider and vote on the proposed
Rule;

HB 1847 26
(2) If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video conference, or other
electronic means, the Commission shall include the mechanism for access to the hearing
in the Notice of Proposed Rulemaking;
(3) The text of the proposed Rule and the reason therefor;
(4) A request for comments on the proposed Rule from any interested person;
and
(5) The manner in which interested persons may submit written comments.
9. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all written
comments and documents received by the Commission in response to the proposed Rule
shall be available to the public.
10. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on
each Commission Rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the Commission
at hearings required by this section.
11. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all Commissioners, take final
action on the proposed Rule based on the rulemaking record.
(1) The Commission may adopt changes to the proposed Rule provided the
changes do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed Rule.
(2) The Commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for substantive
changes made to the proposed Rule as well as reasons for substantive changes not made
that were recommended by commenters.
(3) The Commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for the Rule.
Except for an emergency as provided in subsection 12 of this section, the effective date
of the Rule shall be no sooner than thirty (30) days after the Commission issuing the
notice that it adopted or amended the Rule.
12. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission may consider
and adopt an emergency Rule with 24 hours' notice, with opportunity to comment,
provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the Compact and in this
section shall be retroactively applied to the Rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no
event later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of the Rule. For the purposes of
this provision, an emergency Rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to:
(1) Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
(2) Prevent a loss of Commission or Participating State funds;
(3) Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Rule that is established by federal
law or rule; or
(4) Protect public health and safety.
13. The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission may direct
revisions to a previously adopted Rule for purposes of correcting typographical errors,

HB 1847 27
errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any
revisions shall be posted on the website of the Commission. The revision shall be subject
to challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting. The revision
may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material change to a
Rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the Commission prior to the
end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect without
further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the
approval of the Commission.
14. No Participating State's rulemaking requirements shall apply under this
Compact.
332.745. 1. (1) The executive and judicial branches of State government in each
Participating State shall enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary and
appropriate to implement the Compact.
(2) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the Commission shall
be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the
principal office of the Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and
jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative
dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or
propriety of venue in any action against a Licensee for professional malpractice,
misconduct or any such similar matter.
(3) The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any
proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the Compact or Commission
Rule and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure
to provide the Commission service of process shall render a judgment or order void as
to the Commission, this Compact, or promulgated Rules.
2. (1) If the Commission determines that a Participating State has defaulted in
the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact or the
promulgated Rules, the Commission shall provide written notice to the defaulting State.
The notice of default shall describe the default, the proposed means of curing the
default, and any other action that the Commission may take, and shall offer training
and specific technical assistance regarding the default.
(2) The Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to the other
Participating States.
3. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting State may be
terminated from the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the
Commissioners, and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred on that State by this
Compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default

HB 1847 28
does not relieve the offending State of obligations or liabilities incurred during the
period of default.
4. Termination of participation in the Compact shall be imposed only after all
other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or
terminate shall be given by the Commission to the governor, the majority and minority
leaders of the defaulting State's legislature, the defaulting State's State Licensing
Authority or Authorities, as applicable, and each of the Participating States' State
Licensing Authority or Authorities, as applicable.
5. A State that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments,
obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including
obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination.
6. Upon the termination of a State's participation in this Compact, that State
shall immediately provide notice to all Licensees of the State, including Licensees of
other Participating States issued a Compact Privilege to practice within that State, of
such termination. The terminated State shall continue to recognize all Compact
Privileges then in effect in that State for a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days
after the date of said notice of termination.
7. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a State that is found to be
in default or that has been terminated from the Compact, unless agreed upon in writing
between the Commission and the defaulting State.
8. The defaulting State may appeal the action of the Commission by petitioning
the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the
Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of
such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.
9. (1) Upon request by a Participating State, the Commission shall attempt to
resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise among Participating States and
between Participating States and non-Participating States.
(2) The Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for both mediation and
binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
10. (1) The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce
the provisions of this Compact and the Commission's Rules.
(2) By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal action against a
Participating State in default in the United States District Court for the District of
Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its principal offices to
enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its promulgated Rules. The
relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial
enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such

HB 1847 29
litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees. The remedies herein shall not be the
exclusive remedies of the Commission. The Commission may pursue any other
remedies available under federal or the defaulting Participating State's law.
(3) A Participating State may initiate legal action against the Commission in the
U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the
Commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the
Compact and its promulgated Rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive
relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party
shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.
(4) No individual or entity other than a Participating State may enforce this
Compact against the Commission.
332.750. 1. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the
Compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh Participating State.
(1) On or after the effective date of the Compact, the Commission shall convene
and review the enactment of each of the States that enacted the Compact prior to the
Commission convening ("Charter Participating States") to determine if the statute
enacted by each such Charter Participating State is materially different than the Model
Compact.
(a) A Charter Participating State whose enactment is found to be materially
different from the Model Compact shall be entitled to the default process set forth in
section 332.745.
(b) If any Participating State is later found to be in default, or is terminated or
withdraws from the Compact, the Commission shall remain in existence and the
Compact shall remain in effect even if the number of Participating States should be less
than seven (7).
(2) Participating States enacting the Compact subsequent to the Charter
Participating States shall be subject to the process set forth in subdivision (23) of
subsection 3 of section 332.730 to determine if their enactments are materially different
from the Model Compact and whether they qualify for participation in the Compact.
(3) All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission or in furtherance of the
purposes of the administration of the Compact prior to the effective date of the Compact
or the Commission coming into existence shall be considered to be actions of the
Commission unless specifically repudiated by the Commission.
(4) Any State that joins the Compact subsequent to the Commission's initial
adoption of the Rules and bylaws shall be subject to the Commission's Rules and bylaws
as they exist on the date on which the Compact becomes law in that State. Any Rule

HB 1847 30
that has been previously adopted by the Commission shall have the full force and effect
of law on the day the Compact becomes law in that State.
2. Any Participating State may withdraw from this Compact by enacting a
statute repealing that State's enactment of the Compact.
(1) A Participating State's withdrawal shall not take effect until one hundred
eighty (180) days after enactment of the repealing statute.
(2) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing
State's Licensing Authority or Authorities to comply with the investigative and Adverse
Action reporting requirements of this Compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
(3) Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this Compact, the State
shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all Licensees within that State.
Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing
State shall continue to recognize all Compact Privileges to practice within that State
granted pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days after
the date of such notice of withdrawal.
3. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent
any licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a Participating
State and a non-Participating State that does not conflict with the provisions of this
Compact.
4. This Compact may be amended by the Participating States. No amendment to
this Compact shall become effective and binding upon any Participating State until it is
enacted into the laws of all Participating States.
332.755. 1. This Compact and the Commission's rulemaking authority shall be
liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes, and the implementation and
administration of the Compact. Provisions of the Compact expressly authorizing or
requiring the promulgation of Rules shall not be construed to limit the Commission's
rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
2. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause,
sentence or provision of this Compact is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be
contrary to the constitution of any Participating State, a State seeking participation in
the Compact, or of the United States, or the applicability thereof to any government,
agency, person or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent
jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability thereof
to any other government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
3. Notwithstanding subsection 2 of this section, the Commission may deny a
State's participation in the Compact or, in accordance with the requirements of
subsection 2 of section 332.745, terminate a Participating State's participation in the

HB 1847 31
Compact, if it determines that a constitutional requirement of a Participating State is a
material departure from the Compact. Otherwise, if this Compact shall be held to be
contrary to the constitution of any Participating State, the Compact shall remain in full
force and effect as to the remaining Participating States and in full force and effect as to
the Participating State affected as to all severable matters.
332.760. 1. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other
law of a Participating State that is not inconsistent with the Compact.
2. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a Participating
State in conflict with the Compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
3. All permissible agreements between the Commission and the Participating
States are binding in accordance with their terms.
✔